ru_RU.aff
SFX A Y 93
SFX A   ый    ого         [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    его         цый
SFX A   ый    ому         [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    ему         цый
SFX A   й     м           ый
SFX A   ый    ом          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    ем          цый
SFX A   й     е           ый
SFX A   й     х           ый
SFX A   й     ми          ый
SFX A   ый    ая          ый
SFX A   ый    ой          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    ою          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    ей          цый
SFX A   ый    ую          ый
SFX A   ый    ое          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый    ее          цый
SFX A   ий    ого         [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ому         [гкх]ий
SFX A   й     м           [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ом          [гкх]ий
SFX A   й     е           [гкх]ий
SFX A   й     х           [гкх]ий
SFX A   й     ми          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ая          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ой          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ою          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ую          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    ое          [гкх]ий
SFX A   ий    его         [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   ий    ему         [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   й     м           [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   ий    ем          [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   й     е           [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   й     х           [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   й     ми          [ежнршщч]ий
SFX A   ийся  егося       [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  емуся       [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  имся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  емся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  иеся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  ихся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  имися       [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ий    яя          [ен]ий
SFX A   ий    ая          [жшщч]ий
SFX A   ий    ей          [ежншщч]ий
SFX A   ий    ею          [ежншщч]ий
SFX A   ий    юю          [ен]ий
SFX A   ий    ую          [жшщч]ий
SFX A   ий    ее          [ежншщч]ий
SFX A   ийся  аяся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  ейся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  еюся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  уюся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся  ееся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   й     ю           ой
SFX A   ой    ого         ой
SFX A   ой    ому         ой
SFX A   ой    им          [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ым          [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ом          ой
SFX A   ой    ие          [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ые          [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    их          [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ых          [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ими         [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ыми         [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A   ой    ая          ой
SFX A   ой    ую          ой
SFX A   ой    ое          ой
SFX A   0     ого         ин
SFX A   0     ому         ин
SFX A   0     ым          ин
SFX A   0     ом          ин
SFX A   0     а           ин
SFX A   0     ой          ин
SFX A   0     у           ин
SFX A   0     о           ин
SFX A   0     ы           ин
SFX A   0     ых          ин
SFX A   0     ыми         ин
SFX A   0     а           в
SFX A   0     о           в
SFX A   0     у           в
SFX A   0     ой          в
SFX A   0     ом          в
SFX A   0     ы           в
SFX A   0     ых          в
SFX A   0     ым          в
SFX A   0     ыми         в
SFX A   е     х           [иы]е
SFX A   е     м           [иы]е
SFX A   е     ми          [иы]е

SFX S Y 33
SFX S   ый    0           [^н]ый
SFX S   ый    а           [^н]ый
SFX S   ый    о           [^н]ый
SFX S   ый    ы           [^н]ый
SFX S   ный   ен          [^еёйлнь]ный
SFX S   ный   н           [её]ный
SFX S   йный  ен          йный
SFX S   ный   он          лный
SFX S   ьный  ен          ьный
SFX S   ный   на          [^н]ный
SFX S   ный   но          [^н]ный
SFX S   ный   ны          [^н]ный
SFX S   кий   ок          [^аеёийоуыь]кий
SFX S   кий   к           [аеёиоуы]кий
SFX S   йкий  ек          йкий
SFX S   ький  ек          ький
SFX S   ий    0           [гжчхщ]ий
SFX S   ий    а           [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S   ий    о           [гкх]ий
SFX S   ий    е           [жчщ]ий
SFX S   ий    и           [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S   ой    0           ой
SFX S   ой    а           ой
SFX S   ой    о           ой
SFX S   ой    ы           [^гх]ой
SFX S   ой    и           [гх]ой
SFX S   нный  н           нный
SFX S   ный   а           [^ё]нный
SFX S   ённый ена         ённый
SFX S   ный   о           [^ё]нный
SFX S   ённый ено         ённый
SFX S   ный   ы           [^ё]нный
SFX S   ённый ены         ённый

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   ый    а           нный
SFX X   ый    о           нный
SFX X   ый    ы           нный

SFX E Y 12
SFX E   ый    ее          ый
SFX E   ый    ей          ый
SFX E   е     й           ее
SFX E   ь     я           ь
SFX E   ь     ю           ь
SFX E   ь     ём          ь
SFX E   ь     е           ь
SFX E   я     и           я
SFX E   я     е           [^и]я
SFX E   я     ю           я
SFX E   я     ёй          я
SFX E   я     ёю          я

SFX I Y 30
SFX I   а     ы           [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I   а     и           [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I   а     е           а
SFX I   а     у           а
SFX I   а     ой          [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I   а     ою          [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I   а     ей          [цчшщ]а
SFX I   а     ею          [цчшщ]а
SFX I   а     0           [^к]а
SFX I   ка    ок          [^аежийоуцчшьыюя]ка
SFX I   ка    к           [аеиоуыюя]ка
SFX I   ка    ек          [жцчш]ка
SFX I   йка   ек          йка
SFX I   ька   ек          ька
SFX I   0     м           а
SFX I   0     ми          а
SFX I   0     х           а
SFX I   я     и           я
SFX I   я     е           [^и]я
SFX I   я     ю           я
SFX I   я     ей          я
SFX I   я     ею          я
SFX I   я     й           [еиу]я
SFX I   ня    ен          [^аезийоуыья]ня
SFX I   я     ь           [аеиоуыя]ня
SFX I   йня   ен          йня
SFX I   ьня   ен          ьня
SFX I   0     м           я
SFX I   0     ми          я
SFX I   0     х           я

SFX H Y 14
SFX H   а     ы           [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H   а     и           [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H   а     е           а
SFX H   а     у           а
SFX H   а     ой          [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H   а     ою          [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H   а     ей          ща
SFX H   а     ею          ща
SFX H   й     ю           [ео]й
SFX H   я     и           я
SFX H   я     е           [^и]я
SFX H   я     ю           я
SFX H   я     ей          я
SFX H   я     ею          я

SFX K Y 55
SFX K   0     а           [^ейоь]
SFX K   0     у           [^ейоь]
SFX K   0     ом          [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K   0     е           [^ейоь]
SFX K   0     ы           [^гежйкохчшщь]
SFX K   0     и           [гжкхчшщ]
SFX K   0     ей          [жчшщ]
SFX K   0     ов          [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K   0     ам          [^ейоь]
SFX K   0     ами         [^ейоь]
SFX K   0     ах          [^ейоь]
SFX K   й     я           й
SFX K   й     ю           й
SFX K   й     ем          й
SFX K   й     е           [^и]й
SFX K   й     и           ий
SFX K   й     и           [аеоуюя]й
SFX K   й     ев          й
SFX K   й     ям          й
SFX K   й     ями         й
SFX K   й     ях          й
SFX K   ь     я           ь
SFX K   ь     ю           ь
SFX K   ь     ем          ь
SFX K   ь     е           ь
SFX K   ь     и           ь
SFX K   ь     ей          ь
SFX K   ь     ям          ь
SFX K   ь     ями         ь
SFX K   ь     ях          ь
SFX K   е     я           [^жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     а           [жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ю           [^жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     у           [жцшщ]е
SFX K   0     м           е
SFX K   е     и           ие
SFX K   е     ей          [^жицщь]е
SFX K   ще    щ           ще
SFX K   е     й           ие
SFX K   ье    ий          ье
SFX K   е     ям          [^жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ам          [жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ями         [^жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ами         [жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ях          [^жцшщ]е
SFX K   е     ах          [жцшщ]е
SFX K   о     а           о
SFX K   о     у           о
SFX K   0     м           о
SFX K   о     е           о
SFX K   о     и           [ичш]ко
SFX K   о     0           [вгдст]о
SFX K   о     ам          о
SFX K   о     ами         о
SFX K   о     ах          о
