ru_RU.dic
Ассирия/H
Венеция/H
Илларионовна/I
Калевала/H
Мессина/H
Савельевич/K
Спика/H
Тихоновна/I
аванложей/H
айран/K
аккомпаниаторша/I
альмавива/H
антуриум/K
армянка/I
асбоцементный/A
асептика/H
аффектированный/ASX
балахон/K
барботированный/AS
бархатистый/AES
барышня/H
басня/I
безвинный/AX
беззаконный/AX
безнравственный/AEX
безыскусственный/AX
беспечный/AES
беспрецедентный/AS
беспризорничавший/A
бессмысленный/AEX
бесхитростный/AES
бисквит/K
благовоспитанный/AX
бледный/AES
блондинка/I
боговдохновенный/AX
ботвинья/H
брехня/E
будённовка/I
бук/K
бухнувший/A
вакантный/AS
велосипедистка/I
верный/AES
ветеринар/K
вещественный/AX
вившийся/A
виктимология/H
виртуозный/AES
влиятельный/AES
внучка/I
волопас/K
ворсовавший/A
воткнутый/AS
временный/AX
въедливый/AES
вывихивавший/A
выдоенный/AS
выпускница/I
высаженный/AS
высаживавшийся/A
высокохудожественный/AX
гальванёр/K
гастроэнтерология/H
героизировавший/A
гибельный/AS
гипербола/I
гиподинамия/H
голосистый/AES
голосишко/K
греховодница/I
грязный/AES
гуттаперча/H
датирующий/A
девчушка/I
деепричастие/K
декорированный/AS
деланный/ASX
дефолиация/H
днепропетровский/A
доберман/K
доброжелательный/AES
добрячка/I
домытый/AS
дроблённый/AS
дружественный/AEX
духотища/H
дыра/I
желанный/AEX
жёлудь/K
жизнеспособный/AES
забаррикадированный/AS
завязывающий/A
загадка/I
заизолированный/AS
законченный/ASX
замасливший/A
замысловатый/AES
занудный/AS
засольщица/I
застеленный/AS
застирывавший/A
затаённый/ASX
защёлкнутый/AS
звездолёт/K
злопамятный/AES
зондированный/AS
зоопсихология/H
идиллия/I
изломанный/ASX
износоустойчивый/AES
изображённый/AS
импотент/K
интересный/AES
интерпретировавший/A
инфекция/I
искрошенный/AS
искусственный/AEX
ихтиофауна/H
канализатор/K
канцона/I
капризный/AES
квазилокальный/A
килокалория/I
кинобоевик/K
кислица/H
козуля/I
колоссальный/AS
комендант/K
консервативный/AES
контрмера/I
корнистый/A
короста/H
косяк/K
кофейня/I
ктырь/E
купальщица/I
лакированный/ASX
лакриматор/K
лапшой/H
легкоподвижный/A
лесопильня/I
лихорадочный/AES
лоцман/K
малакология/H
маркий/AS
маркшейдерский/A
математика/I
медленный/AEX
междометие/K
метеорология/H
миндаль/E
мозг/K
молотильный/A
морозоустойчивый/AES
морщина/I
муравушка/H
мучительный/AES
наглядный/AES
надъярус/K
надындивидуальный/A
наезженный/ASX
накачанный/AS
наставительный/AS
настукавший/A
небрежный/AES
невещественный/AX
невидный/AS
незаинтересованный/AX
ненормальный/AS
необоснованный/AX
неподвижный/AS
непосредственный/AX
несдержанный/AEX
неуверенный/AEX
неуказанный/AX
нечистота/H
нитка/I
нитролак/K
новоиспечённый/AX
нормативный/AS
носилочный/A
обознавшийся/A
оборванный/AESX
объеденный/AS
одношпиндельный/A
одушевлённый/ASX
оживлённый/AESX
океан/K
опала/H
организуемый/A
основанный/AS
отбивка/I
отвлечённый/ASX
откатившийся/A
откупщик/K
отстрелянный/AS
оттаянный/AS
отчётливый/AES
падалицей/H
патронный/A
паупер/K
пережжённый/AS
перекатка/H
переламываемый/A
перепланировка/I
пессимистичный/AS
пистолет/K
повзрослее/E
повилика/H
повинный/AX
подбережный/A
подкулачница/I
подпор/K
подсвеченный/AS
покультурнее/E
полуволновой/A
поношенный/ASX
поперечник/K
попротивнее/E
порочный/AES
посправедливее/E
правшой/H
превосходный/AES
предвестница/I
прельстившийся/A
престранный/AX
прибавление/K
пригубленный/AS
пробуравивший/A
проворный/AES
прозорливый/AES
проникновенный/AEX
протест/K
протолчённый/AS
псевдонаука/H
пудрящий/A
пустота/I
радиопротектор/K
раздражительный/AES
размеренный/ASX
разостланный/AS
раскидка/H
расплющивающийся/A
растленный/AX
расшибленный/AS
редуктор/K
резонёрка/I
рентабельный/AES
рециркуляция/H
саботажник/K
самоубийственный/AX
сближавший/A
сверхзадача/I
светосигнализация/H
сенник/K
сердечный/AES
серый/AES
складчина/H
склонный/AX
слёзка/I
слоган/K
смилостивившийся/A
соблазнительный/AES
согнанный/AS
сокращённый/ASX
стена/I
стереоскопия/H
стихарь/E
странный/AEX
стропило/K
стукавшийся/A
суровый/AES
телефотометрия/H
тенденция/I
тоскливый/AES
трек/K
тригонометрия/H
тутовый/A
убийственный/AX
уведённый/AS
удочка/I
умный/AES
умышленный/ASX
утащенный/AS
утонченный/AX
ушибший/A
феминизация/H
ферросплав/K
фреза/I
хандра/H
хохотня/E
ценный/AEX
циферблат/K
человечина/H
чужачка/I
шелудивый/AS
шестикратный/A
экономный/AES
эксгумация/H
эндемик/K
эрудированный/ASX
эстонка/I
эхинацея/H
